Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 3
PROPERTY AND LIABILITY INSURANCE

5-4-301. Property insurance.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance against loss of or damage to property unless:

The insurance covers a substantial risk of loss of or damage to property related to the credit transaction;

The amount, terms, and conditions of the insurance are reasonable in relation to the character and value of the property insured or to be insured; and

The term of the insurance is reasonable in relation to the terms of credit.

The term of the insurance is reasonable if it is customary and does not extend substantially beyond a scheduled maturity.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance against loss of or damage to property unless the amount financed exclusive of charges for the insurance is one thousand dollars or more and the value of the property is one thousand dollars or more.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1232, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-301, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-302. Insurance on creditor's interest only.

If a creditor contracts for or receives a separate charge for insurance against loss of or damage to property, the risk of loss or damage not willfully caused by the consumer is on the consumer only to the extent of any deficiency in the effective coverage of the insurance even though the insurance covers only the interest of the creditor.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1232, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-302, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-303. Liability insurance.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance against liability unless the insurance covers a substantial risk of liability arising out of the ownership or use of property related to the credit transaction.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1232, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-303, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-304. Cancellation by creditor.

This section does not apply to an insurance premium loan. A creditor shall not request cancellation of a policy of property or liability insurance except after the consumer's default or in accordance with a written authorization by the consumer, and in either case the cancellation does not take effect until written notice is delivered to the consumer or mailed to the consumer at his or her address as stated by the consumer. The notice shall state that the policy may be canceled on a date not less than ten days after the notice is delivered or, if the notice is mailed, not less than thirteen days after it is mailed.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1233, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-304, as it existed prior to 2000.